Utah statutes.
4-24-15.   Movement across state line -- Brand inspection required -- Exception -- Application for brand inspection -- Time and place of inspection.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person may not drive or transport any cattle, calves, horses, domesticated elk, or mules from any place within this state to a place outside this state until they have been brand inspected.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply if the animals specified in Subsection (1) customarily forage on an open range which transgresses the Utah state line and that of an adjoining state.

(3)  The owner or person responsible for driving or transporting the animals shall:

(a)  request the department to inspect the brands and marks of the animals to be moved; and

(b)  specify the time and place where the animals may be inspected.

(4)  The department shall conduct the inspection at the time and place specified by the owner or responsible person or at any other time and place as determined by the department.



Amended by Chapter 302, 1997 General Session

